Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.050

Resolution of authorization.

Before the filing of any petition referred to in RCW 39.64.040, such taxing district shall adopt a resolution authorizing the filing thereof and authorizing its duly and regularly elected or appointed attorney or special counsel duly appointed for such purpose to file the same and to represent it in the proceedings with respect thereto in the competent United States district court.

[ 1935 c 143 s 6; RRS s 5608-6.]